Tennessee, session 114, HB0166.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 3-1-103, is amended by adding the
following language as a new subsection:
(f) The office of legislative information systems shall archive the webpage of the
house select committee on redistricting for the 112th general assembly. The office of
legislative information systems shall strive to ensure that all videos, documents, maps,
and other information on the archived webpage remain functional and accessible to the
general public.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
HB0166
000279
- 1 -